Washington statutes.
RCW 36.89.094

Stormwater control facilities—Alternative foreclosure procedures on lien on delinquent charges.

Any county may, by resolution or ordinance, provide that an action to foreclose a stormwater service charge lien may be commenced after three years from the date stormwater service charges become delinquent, in lieu of the provisions provided for in RCW 35.67.230.

[ 1987 c 241 s 4.]